Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.300

Running start program—Definition.

(1) The program established in this section through RCW 28A.600.400 shall be known as the running start program.

(2) For the purposes of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400, "participating institution of higher education" or "institution of higher education" means:

(a) A community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030;

(b) A public tribal college located in Washington and accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities or another accrediting association recognized by the United States department of education; and

(c) Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Washington State University, and The Evergreen State College, if the institution's governing board decides to participate in the program in RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400.

[ 2009 c 450 s 7; 2005 c 207 s 5; 2002 c 80 s 1; 1994 c 205 s 1; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 401.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 450: See note following RCW 28A.600.280.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 207: "The legislature finds that the dropout rate of the state's Native American students is the highest in the state. Approximately one-half of all Native American high school students drop out before graduating with a diploma. The legislature also finds that culturally relevant educational opportunities are important contributors to other efforts to increase the rates of high school graduation for Native American students. The legislature further finds that the higher education participation rate for Native American students is the lowest in the state, and that more can be done to encourage Native American students to pursue higher educational opportunities. The legislature intends to authorize accredited public tribal colleges to participate in the running start program for the purposes of reducing the dropout rate of Native American students and encouraging greater participation rates in higher education." [ 2005 c 207 s 4.]

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.